District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.19

Captive insurance regulatory and supervision trust account.

All fees, fines, penalties, and assessments received by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be deposited in, and credited to, the account established by § 31-1202(BB), and expended in accordance with § 31-1202(BB).

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 20, 52 DCR 1205
This section is referenced in § 31-3932.03.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 20 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).